Delaware, session 153, SB211.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Chapter 81, Title 29 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 8108. Governorâs Council on Agriculture. (b) The Council is composed of 7 9 members who are appointed by the Governor for 3-year terms. The Governor shall appoint the chair, who serves as the chair at the pleasure of the Governor, from among the members. The Council must include 1 member that is a livestock producer, and 1 member that is a farmer aged 40 years or younger.